Tennessee, session 114, HB0279.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-29-246(a), is amended by deleting
subdivision (56).
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-29-251(a), is amended by inserting
the following as a new subdivision:
( ) Tennessee Technological University, board of trustees, created by §§ 49-8-
101 and 49-8-201;
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0279
000360
- 1 -